District of Columbia statutes.
8-2205

General wildlife control operator license conditions.

(a)

To obtain a wildlife control operator license, an applicant shall:

(1)

Be at least 18 years of age;

(2)

Complete a wildlife control operator training class approved by the Department;

(3)

Pass an examination approved by the Department;

(4)

Pay a fee in an amount specified by the Department; and

(5)

Comply with all additional licensing requirements established by the Department.

(b)

A wildlife control operator may perform wildlife control only for wildlife that are designated on his or her license.

(c)

The Department shall identify, by rule, the species of wildlife that may be controlled and specify the methods that may be used to control each species.

(d)

Wildlife, or parts thereof, shall not be sold, bartered, traded, given to another person, or retained for any purpose; provided, that an animal may be given to a wildlife rehabilitator, veterinarian, or animal control officer for rehabilitation or euthanasia.

(e)

The Department may, by rule, establish:

(1)

Minimum liability insurance requirements for wildlife control operators to ensure protection of District residents; and

(2)

Additional licensing requirements for wildlife rehabilitators.

(f)

A wildlife control operator license shall not be transferable.

(g)

A wildlife control operator license shall be renewed biennially.

Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-289, § 6, 57 DCR 11499
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7008, 61 DCR 9990

Former § 8-2205 has been recodified as § 8-2035.

Applicability of D.C. Law 18-289: Section 13 of D.C. Law 18-289, codified as § 8-2212, provided that §§ 8-2204 through 8-2209 shall apply upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan. Section 8-2212 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7008.